Utah statutes.
45-1-202.   Maximum charge.
On the basis of a minimum of an eight-point type, a rate charged in each city
of the fourth and fifth class and each town for the publishing of any notice,
advertisement, or publication of any kind required by law may not be greater
than the open net rate charged for a similar notice, advertisement, or
publication by any other advertiser.
